Utah statutes.
7-1-617.   No concentration limit under state law.
(1)  There is no state deposit cap or concentration limit under Utah law.  A
depository institution or depository institution holding company may control
any percentage of the total deposits held within this state by all depository
institutions of the same class.
(2)  To the extent authorized by federal law, the commissioner may, on a case
by case basis, waive any applicable federal deposit concentration limit that
has the effect of being more limiting than Subsection (1).  In making a
decision to waive a federal deposit concentration limit, the commissioner
shall apply a standard that does not discriminate against out-of-state
depository institutions, upon a finding that the waiver promotes:
(a)  the availability of financial services;
(b)  the marketability of Utah depository institutions; or
(c)  another public interest.
(3)  This section does not affect the applicability, if any, of antitrust law.
